Hawaii statutes.
§412:9-501 Registration
of nondepository financial services loan companies with NMLS. (a) A nondepository financial services loan company licensed under
this chapter is not a mortgage loan originator company as defined in section
454F-1.

(b)
A nondepository financial services loan company shall register with NMLS if any
employee of the nondepository financial services loan company acts as a
mortgage loan originator as defined in section 454F-1 or if the nondepository
financial services loan company uses the services of an exclusive independent
contractor mortgage loan originator, or loan processor or underwriter, as
defined in chapter 454F.

(c)
This section does not exempt an employee of a nondepository financial services
loan company who originates mortgage loans, or an independent contractor
providing mortgage loan originating, processing, or underwriting services to a
nondepository financial services loan company, from licensure under chapter
454F. [L 2010, c 84, §2; am L 2013, c 168, §§1, 20]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next